es: Tipo de anillo de tono del banjo: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Sin anillo de tono; Aro de latón enrollado; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de sonerie pentru tonul banjoului: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Fără inel de ton; Inel din alamă laminată; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Altele
el: Τύπος δαχτυλιδιού τόνου banjo: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Χωρίς δακτύλιο; Στεφάνη από έλαση ορείχαλκου; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип тонален ринг на банджото: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Без тонален пръстен; Навит месингов обръч; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Друго
pl: Typ tone ring banjo: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Brak pierścienia tonowego; Walcowana mosiężna obręcz; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Inne
sk-SK: Typ tónového zvončeka bendža: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Bez tónového prstenca; Valcovaný mosadzný prstenec; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Iný
fr: Type de tone ring du banjo: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Sans anneau de résonance; Cercle en laiton roulé; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Autre
hu: Banjo-hanggyűrű típusa: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Nincs hanggyűrű; Hengerelt sárgaréz karika; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Egyéb
zh-TW: 斑鳩琴音圈類型: 拱頂 (Archtop); Dobson; 平頂 (Flathead); 無共鳴圈; 軋黃銅環; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; 其他
ru: Тип тонального кольца банджо: Арктоп; Добсон; Флэтхэд; Без тон-ринга; Латунное кольцо; Тубафон; Уайт Лейди; Другое
lt-LT: Banjo toninio žiedo tipas: „Archtop“; „Dobson“; „Flathead“; Be toninio žiedo; Valcuotas žalvarinis žiedas; „Tubaphone“; „Whyte Laydie“; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de anel de ressonância do banjo: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Sem anel de ressonância; Aro de latão laminado; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Outro
cs: Typ rezonančního prstence banja: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Bez tónového kroužku; Válcovaná mosazná obruč; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Jiné
nb: Banjotone ringetype: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Ingen tonering; Valset messingring; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Annet
nl: Banjo klankringtype: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Geen toonring; Gewalste messing hoepel; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Overig
de: Art des Banjo-Tonrings: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Kein Tonring; Gewalzter Messingring; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta tonskog prstena bendža: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Bez tonskog prstena; Valjani mjedeni obruč; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Ostalo
da: Type af banjoens tone ring: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Ingen tonering; Valset messingring; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Andet
fi: Banjon reunuksen tyyppi: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Ei äänirengasta; Valssattu messinkirengas; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Muu
ja: Banjoトーンリングタイプ: アーチトップ; ドブソン; フラットヘッド; トーンリングなし; ロールドブラスフープ; チューバフォン; ホワイトレイディ; その他
zh-CN: 班卓琴音环类型: 拱顶; 杜布森 (Dobson); 平顶; 无音环; 卷边黄铜环; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta zvonjenja banja: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Brez tonskega obroča; Obroč iz valjane medenine; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Drugo
vi: Loại vòng cộng hưởng âm thanh banjo: Mặt vòm; Dobson; Mặt phẳng; Không có vòng cộng hưởng; Vòng đồng thau cán; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de anel de tom do banjo: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Sem anel de ressonância; Aro de latão laminado; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Outro
sv: Banjons ringtyp: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Ingen tonring; Rullad mässingsbåge; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Övrigt
en: Banjo tone ring type: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; No tone ring; Rolled brass hoop; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Other
th: ประเภทโทนริงของแบนโจ: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; ไม่มีโทนริง; ห่วงทองเหลืองม้วน; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; อื่นๆ
tr: Banjo ton halkası tipi: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Ton halkası yok; Haddelenmiş pirinç çember; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Diğer
ko: 밴조 톤 링 유형: 아치톱; 돕슨; 플랫헤드; 톤 링 없음; 롤드 브라스 후프; 튜바폰; 화이트 레이디; 기타
it: Anello di risonanza tipo Banjo: Archtop; Dobson; Flathead; Senza tone ring; Anello in ottone rullato; Tubaphone; Whyte Laydie; Altro